Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Cross references. —

As to regulation of intoxicating liquors in Wyoming, see art. 19, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to operating aircraft while under influence of intoxicant, see §

10-6-103

.

As to unlawful possession of alcoholic or malt beverages at polling places, see §

22-26-115

.

As to hunting while intoxicated or under influence of controlled substance, see §

23-3-307

.

As to employment of children under 16 in places selling alcoholic beverages, see §

27-6-114

.

As to alcohol being prohibited in mines, see §

30-2-105

.

As to intoxication as cause for revocation of mine certificate, see §

30-2-311

.

As to driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor and suspension or revocation of driver's licenses, see §§

31-5-233

,

31-7-127

and

31-7-128

.

As to implied consent to chemical testing, see chapter 6 of title 31.

As to penalty for selling adulterated drinks or liquors, see §

35-7-113

.

As to entering mines, mills or factories while intoxicated, and as to taking intoxicants into mines, mills or factories, see §

35-10-402

.

As to sale of alcoholic liquor in Hot Springs state park, see §

36-8-314

.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1, revised this title, amending and renumbering §§

12-1-101

through 12-3-110 as §§

12-1-101

through

12-8-201

. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1978 act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they will be helpful.

Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 2 provides: “If any other act of the legislature enacted during the same session in which this act is enacted is in conflict with the provisions of this act, the other act shall prevail in all cases to the extent of such conflict, regardless of whether enacted before or after the enactment of this act.”

Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 3 provides: “This act is effective January 1, 1979.”

Right to sell liquor not inherent. —

There is no inherent right in Wyoming in a citizen or anyone else to sell intoxicating liquors. Berry v. Arapahoe & Shoshone Tribes, 420 F. Supp. 934, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12845 (D. Wyo. 1976).

No vested right to license. —

There is no vested right in any person to have a liquor license. Berry v. Arapahoe & Shoshone Tribes, 420 F. Supp. 934, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12845 (D. Wyo. 1976).

Unlimited power to prohibit or regulate liquor sales. —

The power of the lawmaker to prohibit or regulate the sale of alcoholic beverages is practically unlimited. Berry v. Arapahoe & Shoshone Tribes, 420 F. Supp. 934, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12845 (D. Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d Intoxicating Liquors § 1 et seq.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance making it offense to have possession of open or unsealed alcoholic beverage in public place, 39 ALR4th 668.

Zoning regulation of intoxicating liquor as pre-empted by state law, 65 ALR4th 555.

Federal regulation of competitive practices in liquor industry under § 5 of federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 USC § 205), 58 ALR Fed 797.

48 C.J.S. Intoxicating Liquors § 1 et seq.